Hawaii statutes.
§431P-10 Coverage available from the
fund; deductible. (a) Policies issued by the fund shall provide a maximum
aggregate coverage of up to $750,000 per risk on real property of one to four
units used for residential purposes and $500,000 per risk for real property
used for business, commercial, or industrial purposes and shall provide for a
mandatory deductible. The deductible amount for residential property policies
shall be the greater of $1,000 or one per cent of the insured value or the
greater of $2,000 or two per cent of the insured value; provided that the board
may establish higher deductible limits. The deductible amount for commercial
property policies shall be the greater of $5,000 or five per cent of the
insured value or an amount equivalent to all the other perils deductible of the
companion policy; provided that the board may establish higher deductible
limits.

(b) Insurers seeking to provide multi-peril
coverage for residential property, including multi-peril coverage of the
hurricane peril, subject to the fund's program for incentives and credits,
shall submit to the commissioner a written request for permission to write the
coverage; provided that in the absence of such authorization, no other policy
of residential property insurance or endorsement to a policy of residential
property insurance on eligible residential property located in this State shall
be issued to provide insurance for damages or losses caused by a covered event
if such coverage is less than that offered by the fund. If multi-peril
coverage on commercial property is no longer being offered by the fund, any
multi-peril coverage on commercial property offered by an insurer shall qualify
as a comparable coverage under section 431P-5(b)(8)(A). Multi-peril coverage
on residential property which [includes] coverage for hurricane losses offered
by an insurer shall qualify as a comparable coverage under section
431P-5(b)(8)(A). [L 1993, c 339, pt of §2; am L Sp 1995, c 17, §5; am L 2000, c
153, §1; am L 2016, c 141, §14]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next